test/src/gt-norm-yamls/VAI_V_CONJ_niimi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfs
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  VAI - V - niimi - CONJ :

  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4
  #neg	persnum	pret	dub

     #Isolation form
     niimi: niimi
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     niimi+Neg: niimisiw
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     niimi+1Pl: niimiaang
     niimi+1Sg: niimiaanh
     niimi+21: niimiing
     niimi+2Pl: niimieg
     niimi+2Sg: niimiin
     niimi+3Obv: niiminid
     niimi+3PlNeg: niimigwaa
     niimi+3PlPos: niimiwaad
     niimi+3Sg: niimid
     niimi+Indef: niiming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     niimi+Pret: niimiban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     niimi+Dub: niimien
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     niimi+Neg+1Pl: niimisiwaang
     niimi+Neg+1Sg: niimisiwaanh
     niimi+Neg+21: niimisiwing
     niimi+Neg+2Pl: niimisiweg
     niimi+Neg+2Sg: niimisiwin
     niimi+Neg+3Obv: niimisiwnid
     niimi+Neg+3PlNeg: niimisiwgwaa
     niimi+Neg+3PlPos: niimisiwwaad
     niimi+Neg+3Sg: niimisiwd
     niimi+Neg+Indef: niimisiwng
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     niimi+Neg+Pret: niimisiwban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     niimi+Neg+Dub: niimisiwen
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     niimi+1Pl+Pret: niimiaangban
     niimi+1Sg+Pret: niimiaanhban
     niimi+21+Pret: niimiingban
     niimi+2Pl+Pret: niimiegban
     niimi+2Sg+Pret: niimiinban
     niimi+3Obv+Pret: niiminidban
     niimi+3PlNeg+Pret: niimigwaaban
     niimi+3PlPos+Pret: niimiwaadban
     niimi+3Sg+Pret: niimidban
     niimi+Indef+Pret: niimingban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     niimi+1Pl+Dub: niimiaangen
     niimi+1Sg+Dub: niimiaanhen
     niimi+21+Dub: niimiingen
     niimi+2Pl+Dub: niimiegen
     niimi+2Sg+Dub: niimiinen
     niimi+3Obv+Dub: niiminiden
     niimi+3PlNeg+Dub: niimigwaaen
     niimi+3PlPos+Dub: niimiwaaden
     niimi+3Sg+Dub: niimiden
     niimi+Indef+Dub: niimingen
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     niimi+Pret+Dub: niimibanen
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     niimi+Neg+1Pl+Pret: niimisiwaangban
     niimi+Neg+1Sg+Pret: niimisiwaanhban
     niimi+Neg+21+Pret: niimisiwingban
     niimi+Neg+2Pl+Pret: niimisiwegban
     niimi+Neg+2Sg+Pret: niimisiwinban
     niimi+Neg+3Obv+Pret: niimisiwnidban
     niimi+Neg+3PlNeg+Pret: niimisiwgwaaban
     niimi+Neg+3PlPos+Pret: niimisiwwaadban
     niimi+Neg+3Sg+Pret: niimisiwdban
     niimi+Neg+Indef+Pret: niimisiwngban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     niimi+Neg+1Pl+Dub: niimisiwaangen
     niimi+Neg+1Sg+Dub: niimisiwaanhen
     niimi+Neg+21+Dub: niimisiwingen
     niimi+Neg+2Pl+Dub: niimisiwegen
     niimi+Neg+2Sg+Dub: niimisiwinen
     niimi+Neg+3Obv+Dub: niimisiwniden
     niimi+Neg+3PlNeg+Dub: niimisiwgwaaen
     niimi+Neg+3PlPos+Dub: niimisiwwaaden
     niimi+Neg+3Sg+Dub: niimisiwden
     niimi+Neg+Indef+Dub: niimisiwngen
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     niimi+Neg+Pret+Dub: niimisiwbanen
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4
     niimi+1Pl+Pret+Dub: niimiaangbanen
     niimi+1Sg+Pret+Dub: niimiaanhbanen
     niimi+21+Pret+Dub: niimiingbanen
     niimi+2Pl+Pret+Dub: niimiegbanen
     niimi+2Sg+Pret+Dub: niimiinbanen
     niimi+3Obv+Pret+Dub: niiminidbanen
     niimi+3PlNeg+Pret+Dub: niimigwaabanen
     niimi+3PlPos+Pret+Dub: niimiwaadbanen
     niimi+3Sg+Pret+Dub: niimidbanen
     niimi+Indef+Pret+Dub: niimingbanen
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     niimi+Neg+1Pl+Pret+Dub: niimisiwaangbanen
     niimi+Neg+1Sg+Pret+Dub: niimisiwaanhbanen
     niimi+Neg+21+Pret+Dub: niimisiwingbanen
     niimi+Neg+2Pl+Pret+Dub: niimisiwegbanen
     niimi+Neg+2Sg+Pret+Dub: niimisiwinbanen
     niimi+Neg+3Obv+Pret+Dub: niimisiwnidbanen
     niimi+Neg+3PlNeg+Pret+Dub: niimisiwgwaabanen
     niimi+Neg+3PlPos+Pret+Dub: niimisiwwaadbanen
     niimi+Neg+3Sg+Pret+Dub: niimisiwdbanen
     niimi+Neg+Indef+Pret+Dub: niimisiwngbanen
     
